District of Columbia statutes.
50-2704

Procedures for reclaiming abandoned, accident, or recovered stolen vehicles that have been privately towed and stored.

An owner or lienholder, or person duly authorized by either, may reclaim an abandoned, accident, or recovered stolen vehicle that was towed by a private company and is stored on a private lot at any time before the expiration of the reclamation period by:

(1)

Appearing at the facility where the vehicle is located;

(2)

Paying the towing charges and storage fees to the tow company and reclaiming the vehicle; and

(3)

Furnishing proof of entitlement to possession of the vehicle.

June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-139, § 5, 53 DCR 3682

History